Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [504B.1545] COORDINATING SERVICES PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Coordinating function" means: new text end new text begin (1) collecting historical or contemporaneous prices, supply levels, or lease or rental contract termination and renewal dates of residential dwelling units from two or more landlords; new text end new text begin (2) analyzing or processing of the information described in clause (1) using a system, software, or process that uses computation, including by using that information to train an algorithm; and new text end new text begin (3) recommending rental prices, lease renewal terms, or ideal occupancy levels to a landlord. new text end new text begin (c) "Coordinator" means any person that operates a software or data analytics service that performs a coordinating function for any landlord, including a landlord performing a coordinating function for their own benefit. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibited conduct. new text end new text begin (a) A landlord must not subscribe to, contract with, or otherwise exchange anything of value in return for the services of a coordinator. new text end new text begin (b) A coordinator must not facilitate an agreement among landlords to not compete with respect to residential dwelling units, including by performing a coordinating function. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Remedies. new text end new text begin In addition to any other remedies available, sections 325D.49 to 325D.66 apply to violations of this section. new text end